District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.26

Procurement authority of the Chief Financial Officer.

The Chief Financial Officer shall carry out procurement of goods and services for the Office of the Chief Financial Officer through a procurement office or division which shall operate independently of, and shall not be governed by, the Office of Contracting and Procurement established under Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2 [Chapter 3A of Title 2] or any successor office, except the provisions applicable under such unit to procurement carried out by the Chief Procurement Officer established by § 2-301.05 [§ 2-352.01] or any successor office shall apply with respect to the procurement carried out by the Chief Financial Officer’s procurement office or division.

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, § 424b
as added Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2037, Pub. L. 109-356, § 203(a)(1)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 201(a), 59 DCR 6190
Section 203(c) of Pub. L. 109-356, as amended by Pub. L. 110-5, § 21073(h), provided: “This section and the amendments made by this section shall take effect October 16, 2007.”

Section 201(a) of D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of Title 2” for “Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2”; and substituted “§ 2-352.01” for “§ 2-301.05” in this section.

Section 201(b) of D.C. Law 19-171 provided that § 201(a) of the act shall become effective upon Congressional enactment.

Section 201(b) of D.C. Law 19-171 provided that § 201(a) of the act shall become effective upon congressional enactment.

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of Title 2” for “Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2”; and substituted “§ 2-352.01” for “§ 2-301.05.”